Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2725
Nonresident estate or trust; share of income; how determined.

(1) The share of a nonresident estate or trust of items of income, gain, loss, and deduction entering into the definition of distributable net income and the share for purposes of section 77-2733 of a nonresident beneficiary of any estate or trust in estate or trust income, gain, loss, and deduction shall be the same amount, subject to the modifications contained in section 77-2716, and have the same character as for federal income tax purposes. When an item entering into the computation of such amounts is not characterized for federal income tax purposes, it shall have the same character as if realized directly from the source from which realized by the estate or trust or incurred in the same manner as incurred by the estate or trust.

(2) The Tax Commissioner may by rule and regulation establish such other method or methods of determining the respective shares of the beneficiaries and of the estate or trust in its income derived from sources in this state as may be appropriate and equitable.

Laws 1967, c. 487, § 25, p. 1582;

Laws 1984, LB 962, § 17;

Laws 1987, LB 773, § 12.